Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0716.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 7204. If a substance is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a controlled substance under federal law and notice of that designation, rescheduling, or deletion is given to the administrator, the substance must be similarly scheduled under section 7201 unless the administrator holds a board meeting not more than 60 days after notice is received to determine whether the substance should be similarly controlled under section 7201. If the administrator decides not to similarly schedule the substance, the administrator shall, not more than 60 days after that decision is made, publish the reasons for that determination. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor